Missouri, session 2026, SB1215.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 217 and 558, RSMo, are amended by
adding thereto two new sections, to be known as sections 217.738
and 558.500, to read as follows:
217.738. 1. Any offender receiving a reduction of
sentence under section 558.500 shall be granted a hearing
before the parole board.
2. In addition to meeting all other requirements of
this chapter, for an offender receiving a reduction of
sentence under section 558.500 to be eligible for supervised
release as a condition of parole, the offender shall provide
to the board the following:
(1) At least five statements from current or former
department of corrections employees attesting to the
offender's demonstration of institutional adaptability and
the offender's conduct in the correctional center;
(2) Signed statements of at least twenty residents of
the community where the offender will reside upon release
supporting the offender's release and who commit to
providing assistance with the offender's reentry into the
community; and

SB 1215 2
(3) A safe and secure home plan for implementation
upon the offender's release.
558.500. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, the sentencing court may, upon
petition, reduce a sentence of life without eligibility for
probation or parole, or reduce a sentence of thirty years or
greater, to a sentence of life with eligibility for
probation or parole if the court determines that:
(1) The convicted person has served at least thirty
years in the department of corrections;
(2) The convicted person was under twenty years of age
at the time the offense was committed; and
(3) Since the commission of the offense the convicted
person has:
(a) Made reasonable efforts toward rehabilitation by
successfully completing rehabilitation programs, which may
include, but shall not be limited to, substance abuse
treatment, effective communication classes, victim impact
classes, vocational training, correspondence courses to
obtain a degree or diploma, or acquiring job skills; and
(b) Exhibited model citizen behavior within his or her
correctional facility, which may include, but shall not be
limited to, maintaining sobriety or demonstrating sober
living; demonstrating traits of leadership; and attending
education-based activities, which may include, but shall not
be limited to, coursework relating to victim impact,
restorative justice, substance abuse treatment, or effective
communication.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, the division of probation and parole shall
supervise any convicted person receiving a reduction of

SB 1215 3
sentence under subsection 1 of this section for the duration
of the convicted person's natural life.
✓